Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.530

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Filing—Notice of hearing.

When a city or town codifies its ordinances, it shall file a typewritten or printed copy of the codification in the office of the city or town clerk. After the first reading of the title of the adopting ordinance and of the title of the code to be adopted thereby, the legislative body of the city or town shall schedule a public hearing thereon. Notice of the hearing shall be published once not more than fifteen nor less than ten days prior to the hearing in the official newspaper of the city, indicating that its ordinances have been compiled, or codified and that a copy of such compilation or codification is on file in the city or town clerk's office for inspection. The notice shall state the time and place of the hearing.

[ 1985 c 469 s 21; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.530. Prior: 1957 c 97 s 4.]